Missouri, session 2026, HB2441.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 301.143, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 301.143, to read as follows:
301.143. 1. As used in this section, the term "vehicle" shall have the same meaning
given it in section 301.010, and the term "physically disabled" shall have the same meaning
given it in section 301.142.
2. Political subdivisions of the state may by ordinance or resolution designate parking
spaces for the exclusive use of vehicles which display a distinguishing license plate or card
issued pursuant to section 301.071 or 301.142. Owners of private property used for public
parking shall also designate parking spaces for the exclusive use of vehicles which display a
distinguishing license plate or card issued pursuant to section 301.071 or 301.142. Whenever
a political subdivision or owner of private property so designates a parking space, the space
shall be indicated by a sign upon which shall be inscribed the international symbol of
accessibility and may also include any appropriate wording such as "Accessible Parking" to
indicate that the space is reserved for the exclusive use of vehicles which display a
distinguishing license plate or card. The sign described in this subsection shall also state, or
an additional sign shall be posted below or adjacent to the sign stating, the following: "$[50
to $300] 100 to $500 fine.". Beginning August 28, 2011, when any political subdivision or
owner of private property restripes a parking lot or constructs a new parking lot, one in every
four accessible spaces, but not less than one, shall be served by an access aisle a minimum of
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2441 2
ninety-six inches wide and shall be designated "lift van accessible only" with signs that meet
the requirements of the federal Americans with Disabilities Act, as amended, and any rules or
regulations established pursuant thereto.
3. Any political subdivision, by ordinance or resolution, and any person or
corporation in lawful possession of a public off-street parking facility or any other owner of
private property may designate reserved parking spaces for the exclusive use of vehicles
which display a distinguishing license plate or card issued pursuant to section 301.071 or
301.142 as close as possible to the nearest accessible entrance. Such designation shall be
made by posting immediately adjacent to, and visible from, each space, a sign upon which is
inscribed the international symbol of accessibility, and may also include any appropriate
wording to indicate that the space is reserved for the exclusive use of vehicles which display a
distinguishing license plate or card.
4. The local police or sheriff's department may cause the removal of any vehicle not
displaying a distinguishing license plate or card on which is inscribed the international
symbol of accessibility and the word "disabled" issued pursuant to section 301.142 or a
"disabled veteran" license plate issued pursuant to section 301.071 or a distinguishing license
plate or card issued by any other state from a space designated for physically disabled persons
if there is posted immediately adjacent to, and readily visible from, such space a sign on
which is inscribed the international symbol of accessibility and may include any appropriate
wording to indicate that the space is reserved for the exclusive use of vehicles which display a
distinguishing license plate or card. Any person who parks in a space reserved for physically
disabled persons and is not displaying distinguishing license plates or a card is guilty of an
infraction and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not less than [fifty] one
hundred dollars nor more than [three] five hundred dollars. Any vehicle which has been
removed and which is not properly claimed within thirty days thereafter shall be considered to
be an abandoned vehicle.
5. Spaces designated for use by vehicles displaying the distinguishing "disabled"
license plate issued pursuant to section 301.142 or 301.071 shall meet the requirements of the
federal Americans with Disabilities Act, as amended, and any rules or regulations established
pursuant thereto. Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section, on-street parking
spaces designated by political subdivisions in residential areas for the exclusive use of
vehicles displaying a distinguishing license plate or card issued pursuant to section 301.071 or
301.142 shall meet the requirements of the federal Americans with Disabilities Act pursuant
to this subsection and any such space shall have clearly and visibly painted upon it the
international symbol of accessibility and any curb adjacent to the space shall be clearly and
visibly painted blue.

HB 2441 3
6. Any person who, without authorization, uses a distinguishing license plate or card
issued pursuant to section 301.071 or 301.142 to park in a parking space reserved under
authority of this section shall be guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
7. Law enforcement officials may enter upon private property open to public use to
enforce the provisions of this section and section 301.142, including private property
designated by the owner of such property for the exclusive use of vehicles which display a
distinguishing license plate or card issued pursuant to section 301.071 or 301.142.
8. Nonconforming signs or spaces otherwise required pursuant to this section which
are in use prior to August 28, 2011, shall not be in violation of this section during the useful
life of such signs or spaces. Under no circumstances shall the useful life of the
nonconforming signs or spaces be extended by means other than those means used to
maintain any sign or space on the owner's property which is not used for vehicles displaying a
disabled license plate.
9. Beginning August 28, 2011, all new signs erected under this section shall not
contain the words "Handicap Parking" or "Handicapped Parking".
✔